District of Columbia statutes.
47-4643

800 Kenilworth Avenue Northeast redevelopment project.

The real property described as Lot 8, Square 5058, and any improvements thereon, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title for 10 years.

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-293, § 2(b), 57 DCR 11512

History

Short title: Section 711 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle B of title VII of the act may be cited as “Budget Financing Contingencies Act of 2010”.

Short Title

Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-293 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 712 of D.C. Law 18-370 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 18-293.

Editor's Notes